District of Columbia statutes.
2-1535.04

Secondary investigation appeal.

(a)

(1)

A party who is not satisfied with the outcome of the initial investigation conducted pursuant to § 2-1535.03(b)(7) may request a secondary investigation by submitting a written appeal to the higher-level authority in the agency, educational institution, or grantee designated to hear appeals within 30 days of the conclusion of the investigation conducted pursuant to § 2-1535.03(b)(7).

(2)

The secondary investigation shall be completed within 30 days of receipt of the appeal, unless:

(A)

Circumstances require additional time to complete a thorough investigation;

(B)

The higher-level authority sets forth those circumstances in writing; and

(C)

The additional time does not exceed 15 days.

(b)

(1)

When an appeal for a secondary investigation is submitted, the agency, educational institution, or grantee shall inform the party about his or her ability to seek further redress under the Human Rights Act.

(2)

This section shall not be construed to limit the right of a person to assert or seek redress for a claim arising under the Human Rights Act.

Sept. 14, 2012, D.C. Law 19-167, § 5, 59 DCR 7820
This section is referenced in § 2-1535.03.